Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Historical Events Celebration Commission

153.310.
Definition for KRS 153.320 to 153.370. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 128, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.320.
Kentucky Historical Events Celebration Commission — Members — Expiration of commission. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 128, § 2; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.330.
Commission to establish executive committee — Meetings. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 128, § 3; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.340.
Commission’s purpose — Reports — Duties. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 128, § 4; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.350.
Powers of commission. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 128, § 5; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.360.
Commission members’ expenses — Compensation — Disbursement of funds. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 128, § 6; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.370.
Commission membership not to be incompatible with state office. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 128, § 7; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.